Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.080

Disclosure document—Director authorized to accept alternative.

The director may, by rule or order:

(1) Accept any disclosure document filed with agencies of the United States or any other state; or

(2) Accept any disclosure document compiled in accordance with any rule or regulation of any agency of the United States or any other state; or

(3) Waive disclosure of information which is inapplicable or unnecessary for protection of purchasers.

[ 1981 c 155 s 8.]